Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the community and technical college system is an important conduit to our communities and is a key for the state to meet the 70 percent credential goal and to fill workforce gaps. The state of Washington is in the middle of a workforce and affordability crisis. Flexible, online, affordable options are an essential part of the solution. Allowing colleges to reach students regarding entirely online course offerings outside their district is a first step in creating a virtual campus. A virtual campus, like what California community colleges have created, would provide students affordable options without having to move or find transportation. Students in Washington state should have a single place where they can register for online classes and cross enroll. A virtual campus would help students upskill or reskill and allow for students to have access to online classes needed for their degree when they live out-of-district.The legislature further finds that Washington state cannot afford to leave talent on the sidelines. Washington state needs skilled workers, and it should not matter where a student lives to receive the right education. Therefore, the legislature intends that, by allowing respective community and technical colleges to reach students out-of-district, a conversation can begin around establishing a virtual campus for all Washingtonians.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) Community and technical colleges may distribute information on their respective colleges outside of their district when it pertains to entirely online course offerings. Information provided by community and technical colleges may include unsolicited course and enrollment information. In providing this information, community and technical colleges may use, but are not limited to: Digital advertising, email, direct mail, newspaper advertisements, newspaper inserts, and other methods of mass distribution to those outside of a college district.(2) Community and technical colleges may prioritize and make known to the citizens of its district courses and programs offered exclusively by neighboring districts.(3) Community and technical colleges may not compete with each other for enrollment.--- END ---